New York, session 2025-2026, A5595.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs f and i of subdivision 1 of section 415 of the 2 vehicle and traffic law, as amended by chapter 554 of the laws of 2015, 3 are amended and two new paragraphs n and o are added to read as follows: 4 f. "New motor vehicle dealer" means a dealer who engages in the activ- 5 ities described in paragraph a of this subdivision if such activities 6 relate to new motor vehicles and if such dealer is party to a franchise, 7 as the terms "new motor vehicle" and "franchise" are defined in section 8 four hundred sixty-two of this title; provided, however, for purposes of 9 this definition, a new motor vehicle shall include only those motor 10 vehicles commonly classified as a passenger automobile, sport utility 11 vehicle, light truck, pickup truck, van, minivan, or suburban, with a 12 gross vehicle weight rating of ten thousand pounds or less, and shall 13 not include (i) any such vehicle which has been converted for use as a 14 tow truck, or (ii) a motor vehicle for which the current ownership docu- 15 ment is a statement of acquisition issued pursuant to section four 16 hundred twenty-nine of this title, a salvage certificate, salvage 17 certificate of title, nonrepairable certificate, or similar document 18 issued by any state or jurisdiction[;], or (iii) any motor vehicle 19 commonly classified as a bus, school bus, garbage truck, marine trailer, 20 tow truck, motorcycle, recreational vehicle, snowmobile, trailer, mobile 21 home or construction equipment; and provided further that: (i) a dealer 22 is a new motor vehicle dealer only with respect to those vehicles which 23 are of the same make as those which that dealer is authorized to sell at 24 that location pursuant to a valid franchise agreement; and (ii) a dealer EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04908-01-5 A. 5595 2 1 is not acting as a new motor vehicle dealer when displaying, advertis- 2 ing, storing and/or demonstrating a new mobility vehicle. 3 i. "Used motor vehicle" means any vehicle not included in the defi- 4 nition of a new motor vehicle. Provided, however, that such term as used 5 in paragraph g of this subdivision shall include only those motor vehi- 6 cles commonly classified as a passenger automobile, sport utility vehi- 7 cle, light truck, pick up truck, van, minivan or suburban, with a gross 8 vehicle weight rating of ten thousand pounds or less, which (i) is not 9 deemed to be a "new motor vehicle" pursuant to paragraph h of this 10 subdivision, or (ii) has not been converted for use as a tow truck or 11 mobility vehicle, or (iii) is not commonly classified as a bus, school 12 bus, garbage truck, marine trailer, tow truck, motorcycle, recreational 13 vehicle, snowmobile, trailer, mobile home, or construction equipment. 14 n. (i) "Mobility dealer" means a person who displays for sale or 15 advertises for sale more than five mobility vehicles in any calendar 16 year or who displays or permits the display of three or more mobility 17 vehicles at any one time or within any one calendar month upon premises 18 owned or controlled by such person, regardless of the ownership of such 19 mobility vehicles. 20 (ii) Mobility dealer does not include any of the following: 21 (A) receivers, trustees, administrators, executors, guardians or other 22 persons appointed by or acting under the judgment or order of any court; 23 (B) public officers while performing their official duties; 24 (C) persons disposing of motor vehicles acquired for their own use or 25 for the use of a family member, and actually so used, when the vehicles 26 have been acquired and used in good faith and not for the purposes of 27 avoiding the provisions of this section; 28 (D) financial institutions who sell repossessed mobility vehicles; 29 (E) insurance companies who resell mobility vehicles that they 30 acquired in the course of business. 31 o. "Mobility equipment" means mechanical or electronic devices, parts 32 or accessories specifically designed to facilitate the use of a motor 33 vehicle by an aging or disabled person as interpreted by the National 34 Highway Traffic Safety Administration and which are permanently attached 35 to or incorporated in the vehicle. 36 § 2. The opening paragraph and paragraph c of subdivision 3 of section 37 415 of the vehicle and traffic law, as amended by chapter 7 of the laws 38 of 2000, are amended and a new paragraph b-1 is added to read as 39 follows: 40 Registration of new motor vehicle dealers, mobility dealers, qualified 41 dealers, and other motor vehicle dealers. 42 b-1. No person shall engage in business as a mobility dealer, or 43 represent, advertise, or otherwise hold themself out as engaged or 44 intending to engage in the business of displaying, advertising or inven- 45 torying new mobility vehicles in this state, unless there shall have 46 been issued to such person a certificate of registration as a mobility 47 dealer as provided in this subdivision and subdivision seven of this 48 section. Provided, however, that a registered new motor vehicle dealer 49 or qualified dealer may engage in business as a mobility dealer, or 50 represent, advertise, or otherwise hold themself out as engaged or 51 intending to engage in the business of selling, displaying, offering, 52 advertising or inventorying mobility vehicles in this state, without 53 having been issued to such registered new motor vehicle dealer or quali- 54 fied dealer a certificate of registration as a mobility dealer. 55 c. The issuance of such certificate of registration to a new motor 56 vehicle dealer, a qualified dealer, mobility dealer or other motor vehi- A. 5595 3 1 cle dealer shall be deemed to include the right to operate motor vehi- 2 cles, motorcycles and trailers to the extent permitted by subdivision 3 eight of this section, instead of obtaining vehicle registration as 4 provided by sections four hundred one and four hundred ten of this 5 title. The provisions of this section shall not apply to persons engaged 6 in the business of buying, selling or dealing in snowmobiles and/or snow 7 travellers. 8 § 3. The opening paragraph and paragraph a of subdivision 6-b of 9 section 415 of the vehicle and traffic law, the opening paragraph as 10 amended by chapter 7 of the laws of 2000 and paragraph a as amended by 11 chapter 342 of the laws of 2016, are amended to read as follows: 12 Dealer, qualified dealer, mobility dealer and new motor vehicle dealer 13 surety bond. a. As a condition to obtaining a registration certificate 14 pursuant to this section, every new motor vehicle dealer applicant 15 [and], every qualified dealer applicant and every mobility dealer appli- 16 cant shall obtain and continue in effect a surety bond in an amount of 17 fifty thousand dollars executed by a surety company authorized to trans- 18 act business in the state by the department of financial services of the 19 state. As a condition to obtaining a registration certificate pursuant 20 to this section, every mobility dealer applicant and every dealer appli- 21 cant who is applying for a registration certificate in the first 22 instance or who sold fifty motor vehicles or fewer in the previous 23 calendar year shall obtain and continue in effect a surety bond in an 24 amount of twenty thousand dollars executed by a surety company author- 25 ized to transact business in the state by the department of financial 26 services of the state. As a condition of obtaining a registration 27 certificate pursuant to this section, every dealer applicant who sold 28 more than fifty motor vehicles in the previous calendar year shall 29 obtain and continue in effect a surety bond in an amount of one hundred 30 thousand dollars executed by a surety company authorized to transact 31 business in the state by the department of financial services of the 32 state. The bonds shall be approved as to form by the commissioner and 33 shall be conditioned on the new motor vehicle dealer's, qualified deal- 34 er's, and dealer's: payment of all valid bank drafts, including checks, 35 drawn by such dealer for the purchase of motor vehicles; transfer of 36 good title to each motor vehicle such dealer sells; safekeeping of all 37 customer deposits related to the sale of a motor vehicle between the 38 time of receipt of such customer deposit and the transfer of good title 39 to the vehicle to the customer; payment for all fines imposed upon the 40 new motor vehicle dealer, qualified dealer, or dealer by the commission- 41 er pursuant to the provisions of this chapter; and such dealer's repay- 42 ment of any overcharges of a customer by such dealer for the vehicle 43 registration and titling charges payable to the commissioner for regis- 44 tering and titling the sold vehicle. Any such dealer which is bonded 45 pursuant to this section prior to the effective date of the chapter of 46 the laws of two thousand sixteen which amended this paragraph shall be 47 required to comply with the amendments made by such chapter upon 48 renewal, replacement, alteration, or extension of such dealer's current 49 surety bond. 50 § 4. Paragraph c of subdivision 7 of section 415 of the vehicle and 51 traffic law, as amended by chapter 7 of the laws of 2000, is amended and 52 a new paragraph b-1 is added to read as follows: 53 b-1. Registration certificates for mobility dealers. (i) Application. 54 If a person makes application, under penalty of perjury, for a registra- 55 tion certificate as a mobility dealer, the commissioner shall issue a 56 registration as a mobility dealer to such dealer upon payment of the A. 5595 4 1 prescribed fee and any requirements the commissioner may prescribe by 2 regulation. 3 (ii) Rights of mobility dealers. Notwithstanding any other law or 4 rule, a person holding a mobility dealer certificate shall have the 5 right to: 6 (A) display, inventory, advertise, solicit, or demonstrate any mobili- 7 ty vehicle, regardless of the chassis make of the mobility vehicle, and 8 regardless of whether ownership of such mobility vehicle is held by a 9 new motor vehicle dealer inside or outside this state; 10 (B) arrange, negotiate, and/or assist consumers as regards the 11 purchase of any mobility vehicle; 12 (C) sell and install mobility equipment and accessories and other 13 goods and services to meet the needs particular to disabled drivers and 14 passengers; 15 (D) provide mobility vehicle maintenance and repair services. 16 (iii) Prohibitions. Notwithstanding any other law or rule, a person 17 holding a mobility dealer certificate shall not have the right to 18 perform repairs on mobility vehicles or other motor vehicles, without 19 obtaining a license as a repair shop pursuant to article twelve-A of 20 this chapter, however, a mobility dealer may, without obtaining such 21 license, perform repairs on parts which are unique to mobility vehicles 22 and were not part of the original manufactured motor vehicle. 23 (iv) Regulations by the commissioner. The commissioner shall have the 24 power to promulgate such regulations as are necessary to implement 25 mobility dealer registration and establish reasonable and appropriate 26 qualifications for such dealers. 27 c. Registration certificate for other than new motor vehicle dealer, 28 mobility dealer or qualified dealer. If the commissioner approves the 29 application of an applicant for a registration certificate other than a 30 new motor vehicle dealer certificate or a qualified dealer certificate, 31 upon payment of the prescribed fee, [he or she] such commissioner shall 32 issue a registration certificate in such form as [he or she] such 33 commissioner may prescribe. 34 § 5. Section 198-a of the general business law is amended by adding a 35 new subdivision (p) to read as follows: 36 (p) This section shall not apply to mobility equipment as defined in 37 subdivision one of section four hundred fifteen of the vehicle and traf- 38 fic law. 39 § 6. Section 198-b of the general business law is amended by adding a 40 new subdivision h to read as follows: 41 h. This section shall not apply to mobility equipment as defined in 42 subdivision one of section four hundred fifteen of the vehicle and traf- 43 fic law. 44 § 7. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 45 it shall have become a law.